Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.556

Failure to provide recording of school district board of directors meeting.

The failure to provide a recording of a school district board of directors meeting that is required to be recorded under RCW 42.30.035(2) shall not be a basis for finding that a requester has been denied an opportunity to inspect or copy a public record if the recording, despite the good faith efforts of the school district board of directors to create a recording, is unavailable or unintelligible due to technical issues.

[ 2023 c 67 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 67: See note following RCW 42.30.035.